Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6012YH (7) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2160 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68A.303A Personal and home security 1 expenses. 2 1. In addition to the uses permitted under sections 68A.302 3 and 68A.303, a candidate or candidateâs committee may use 4 campaign funds to pay for personal and home security expenses 5 if the payment to the personal or home security provider is 6 reasonable for the services rendered. 7 2. A candidate using campaign funds for personal or home 8 security expenses shall keep a log detailing the date, name 9 of the personal or home security provider, and cost for each 10 personal or home security expense paid or owed by the campaign 11 or candidate. Total personal and home security expenses shall 12 be included as a line-item expense in a report submitted 13 pursuant to section 68A.402. A candidateâs log of personal 14 and home security expenses shall be provided to the board if 15 requested during the course of an audit. The candidateâs 16 committee shall preserve a personal and home security log for 17 five years following the submission of a report relating to 18 the log, or for three years following the dissolution of the 19 candidateâs committee. 20 3. For purposes of this section, âpersonal and home security 21 expensesâ includes but is not limited to expenses related to the 22 purchase of firearms, firearm equipment, and training. 23